Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.294

Board on geographic names—Adoption of names—Publication in the Washington State Register—Official names.

(1) The board on geographic names shall consider the recommendations made by the committee on geographic names for adoption of names. The board on geographic names must either adopt the name as recommended, or refer the matter back to the committee on geographic names for further review.

(2) All geographic names adopted by the board on geographic names shall be published in the Washington State Register.

(3) Whenever the board on geographic names has given a name to any lake, stream, place, or other geographic feature within the state, the name must be used in all maps, records, documents, and other publications issued by the state or any of its departments and political subdivisions, and that name is the official name of the geographic feature.

[ 2011 c 355 s 5.]